Massachusetts, session 194th, H244.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 210 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 2 the following section:-
Section 21⁄2. (a) For the purposes of this section “placement agency” shall mean a
department, agency or institution of the commonwealth, or any political subdivision thereof, or
any organization incorporated under chapter 180, 1 of whose principal purposes is providing
custodial care and social services to children, which receives by agreement with a parent or
guardian, by contract with a state agency or as a result of referral by a court of competent
jurisdiction, any child under the age of 18 years of age for placement in adoption.
(b) Any placement agency that receives written consent for adoption required by section
2 from a biological parent shall provide the biological parent with an anonymous family medical
history form and encourage the biological parent to complete the form to the best of their
knowledge. The anonymous family medical history form shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
of 2

any known genetic predispositions and health conditions of the parent and (ii) any known genetic
predispositions and health conditions of the parent’s relatives within 2 degrees of consanguinity.
No placement agency shall require the completion of the form as a condition of acceptance of
written consent for adoption required by the section 2.(c) Upon the adoption of any child whose
biological parent completed an anonymous family medical history form, the placement agency
shall provide the form to the child’s adoptive parent. Any information about the biological
parents included in the anonymous family medical history form shall not identify or tend to lead
to the identification of the biological parents or their present or former locations. No prospective
adoptive parent shall have access to the anonymous medical history form completed by a child’s
biological parent prior to the child’s adoption.
SECTION 2. This act shall be known as “Patricia and Francesca's Law”.
of 2